South Dakota, session 2026, HB1200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $5,500,000 from the general fund, to the Department of
Public Safety, for the purpose of providing grants to nonprofit organizations that have as a
primary focus the provision of assistance to:
(1) Children who have been abused or neglected;
(2) Victims of domestic violence;
(3) Victims of sexual assault; or
(4) Victims of commercial sexual exploitation or sexual trafficking.
Section 2. The Department of Public Safety shall annually provide grants in accordance with
section 1 of this Act on the basis of applications received during the period beginning July first
and ending August thirty-first, of each year.
Recipients may use the grants for:
(1) The provision of 24/7 emergency and transitional services, including food, lodging,
and transportation;
(2) The provision of services by counselors licensed under title 36, whether as
employees or contractors;
(3) The support of a 24/7 crisis line;
(4) Case management services;
(5) The training, certification, or employment of a sexual assault nurse examiner; or
(6) Services provided through a child advocacy center.
The department may award grants only for services that are listed in this section
and not fully funded by other resources available through the department. The department
shall prioritize the awarding of grants to organizations that have attempted to raise the
moneys necessary for the provision of the listed services.

26.814.26 2 1200
Grants may not be used to establish a new program or organization, or for the
provision of legal services.
Each recipient of a grant under this section shall deliver to the Department of Public
Safety, at the time and in the manner directed by the department, an annual report
detailing the types of services that were delivered using grants awarded under this Act
and the number of unique service recipients.
The Department of Public Safety may expend moneys from the appropriation
provided in section 1 of this Act for the administrative costs necessary to award and
monitor the grants.
Section 3. The secretary of the Department of Public Safety shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized by this Act.
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 5. This Act is effective beginning June 30, 2026.
HB1200 ENROLLED

26.814.26 3 1200
An Act to make an appropriation for victim services provided by nonprofit organizations.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1200
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1200 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1200 ENROLLED